Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3A-502]
Nondiscrimination. A licensee shall not unfairly discriminate against any
consumer or customer because that consumer or customer has opted out from the
disclosure of nonpublic personal financial information under this article. [L
2001, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next